Utah statutes.
67-4a-207.   Refunds and payments resulting from judicial or administrative proceedings.

(1)  The sum to be paid as a refund, under an order or decision of a court or administrative agency or by agreement, that remains outstanding for more than one year after it became payable is considered abandoned unless the apparent owner has communicated in writing with the holder concerning that sum within the preceding six months.

(2)  Any sum payable or intangible property distributable in the course of a voluntary or involuntary dissolution or liquidation that remains unclaimed for one year after the date of the final distribution or liquidation is considered abandoned unless the apparent owner has communicated in writing with the holder concerning that sum or distribution within the preceding six months.

(3)  Intangible property payable or distributable to a member of or participant in a class action that remains unclaimed for more than one year after the time for the final payment or distribution is considered abandoned, unless the apparent owner has communicated in writing with the holder concerning the property within the preceding six months.

(4)  Intangible property payable or distributable as the result of litigation or settlement of a dispute before a judicial or administrative body that remains unclaimed for more than one year after the time for the final payment or distribution is considered abandoned unless the apparent owner has communicated in writing concerning the property within the preceding six months.



Enacted by Chapter 198, 1995 General Session

